North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 4. Vital Statistics.

§ 130A-90.
Vital statistics program.

The Department shall maintain a Vital Statistics Program which shall operate the only system of vital records registration throughout this State.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Property Rights Over Personal Data: An Alternative for Standing in Data Breach Cases,” see 56 Wake Forest L. Rev. 387 (2021).

§ 130A-91.
State Registrar.

The Secretary shall appoint a State Registrar of Vital Statistics. The State Registrar of Vital Statistics shall exercise all the authority conferred by this Article.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 2; C.S., s. 7088; 1955, c. 951, s. 5; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1977, c. 163, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-92.
Duties of the State Registrar.

The State Registrar shall secure and maintain all vital records required under this Article and shall do all things necessary to carry out its provisions. The State Registrar shall:

Examine vital records received from local registrars to determine if these records are complete and satisfactory, and require the provision of information necessary to make the records complete and satisfactory;

Permanently preserve the information from the vital records in a systematic manner in adequate fireproof space which shall be provided in a State building by the Department of Administration, and maintain a comprehensive and continuous index of all vital
records;

Prepare and supply or approve all forms used in carrying out the provisions of this Article;

Appoint local registrars as required by

G.S. 130A-95

and exercise supervisory authority over local registrars, deputy local registrars and sub-registrars;

Enforce the provisions of this Article, investigate cases of irregularity or violations and report violations to law-enforcement officials for prosecution under

G.S. 130A-26

;

Conduct studies and research and recommend to the General Assembly any additional legislation necessary to carry out the purposes of this Article; and

Adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this Article.

The State Registrar may retain payments made in excess of the fees established by this Article if the overpayment is in the amount of three dollars ($3.00) or less and the payor does not request a refund of the overpayment. The State Registrar is not
required to notify the payor of any overpayment of three dollars ($3.00) or less.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 1; C.S., s. 7086; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1971, c. 444, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 366; 1993, c. 146, s. 2.

§ 130A-93.
Access to vital records; copies.

Only the State Registrar shall have access to original vital records and to indices to the original vital records. County offices authorized to issue certificates and the North Carolina State Archives also shall have access to indices to these original
vital records, when specifically authorized by the State Registrar.

The following birth data, in any form and on any medium, in the possession of the Department, local health departments, or local register of deeds offices shall not be public records pursuant to Chapter 132 of the General Statutes: the names of children
and parents, the addresses of parents (other than county of residence and postal code), and the social security numbers of parents. Access to copies and abstracts of these data shall be provided in accordance with

G.S. 130A-99

, Chapter 161 of the General Statutes, and this section. All other birth data shall be public records pursuant to Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. All birth records and data are State property and shall be managed
only in accordance with official disposition instructions prepared by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. The application of this Chapter is subject to the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 121 of the General Statutes,
the North Carolina Archives and History Act. The State Registrar and other officials authorized to issue certified copies of vital records shall provide copies or abstracts of vital records, except those described in subsections
(d), (e), (f) and (g) of this section, to any person upon request.

The State Registrar and other officials authorized to issue certified copies of vital records shall provide certified copies of vital records, except those described in subsections (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this section, only to the following:

A person requesting a copy of the person’s own vital records or that of the person’s spouse, sibling, direct ancestor or descendant, or stepparent or stepchild;

A person seeking information for a legal determination of personal or property rights; or

An authorized agent, attorney or legal representative of a person described above.

(c1) A funeral director or funeral service licensee shall be entitled upon request to a certified copy of a death certificate.

(c2) An agency acting as a confidential intermediary in accordance with

G.S. 48-9-104

shall be entitled to a certified copy of a death certificate upon request.

Copies, certified copies or abstracts of birth certificates of adopted persons shall be provided in accordance with

G.S. 48-9-107

.

Copies or abstracts of the health and medical information contained on birth certificates shall be provided only to a person requesting a copy of the health and medical information contained on the person’s own birth certificate, a person authorized by
that person, or a person who will use the information for medical research purposes. Copies of or abstracts from any computer or microform database which contains individual-specific health or medical birth data, whether the database
is maintained by the Department, a local health department, or any other public official, shall be provided only to an individual requesting his or her own data, a person authorized by that individual, or a person who will use
the information for medical research purposes. The State Registrar shall adopt rules providing for the use of this information for medical research purposes. The rules shall, at a minimum, require a written description of the proposed
use of the data, including protocols for protecting confidentiality of the data.

Copies, certified copies or abstracts of new birth certificates issued to persons in the federal witness protection program shall be provided only to a person requesting a copy of the person’s own birth certificate and that person’s supervising federal
marshall.

No copies, certified copies or abstracts of vital records shall be provided to a person purporting to request copies, certified copies or abstracts of that person’s own vital records upon determination that the person whose vital records are being requested
is deceased.

A certified copy issued under the provisions of this section shall have the same evidentiary value as the original and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the document. The State Registrar may appoint agents who shall have the authority
to issue certified copies under a facsimile signature of the State Registrar. These copies shall have the same evidentiary value as those issued by the State Registrar.

Fees for issuing any copy of a vital record or for conducting a search of the files when no copy is made shall be as established in

G.S. 130A-93.1

and

G.S. 161-10

.

No person shall prepare or issue any certificate which purports to be an official certified copy of a vital record except as authorized in this Article or the rules.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 325, s. 1; 1991, c. 343, s. 1; 1993, c. 146, s. 3; 1995, c. 457, s. 7; 1997-242, s. 1; 2010-116, s. 4; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-116, s. 4, effective October 1, 2010, added subsection (c2).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” in subsection (b).

§ 130A-93.1.
Fees for vital records copies or search; automation fund.

The State Registrar shall collect, process, and utilize fees for services as follows:

A fee not to exceed twenty-four dollars ($24.00) shall be charged for issuing a first copy of a vital record or for conducting a routine search of the files for the record when no copy is made. A fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) shall be charged for each
additional certificate copy requested from the same search. When certificates are issued or searches conducted for statewide issuance by local agencies using databases maintained by the State Registrar, the local agency
shall charge and forward to the State Registrar for the purposes established in subsection (b) of this section fourteen dollars ($14.00) and shall charge and retain ten dollars ($10.00) if a copy of the record is made.
Provided, however, that a local agency may waive the ten dollar ($10.00) charge for its retention when the copy is issued to a person over the age of 62 years.

A fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) for in-State requests and not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for out-of-state requests shall be charged in addition to the fee charged under subdivision (1) of this subsection and to all shipping and commercial
charges when expedited service is specifically requested.

(2a)
The fee for a copy of a computer or microform database shall not exceed the cost to the agency of making and providing the copy.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, fees collected under this subsection shall be used by the Department for public health purposes.

The Vital Records Automation Account is established as a nonreverting account within the Department. Five dollars ($5.00) of each fee collected pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) shall be credited to this Account. The Department shall use the revenue in the
Account to fully automate and maintain the vital records system. When funds sufficient to fully automate and maintain the system have accumulated in the Account, fees shall no longer be credited to the Account but shall be used
as specified in subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

Upon verification of voter registration, the State Registrar shall not charge any fee under subsection (a) of this section to a registered voter who signs a declaration stating the registered voter is registered to vote in this State and does not have
a certified copy of that registered voter’s birth certificate or marriage license necessary to obtain photo identification acceptable under

G.S. 163-166.16

. Any declaration shall prominently include the penalty under G.S. 163-275(13) for falsely or fraudulently making the declaration.

History.
1991, c. 343, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 5; 1997-242, s. 2; 2002-126, s. 29A.18(a); 2009-451, s. 10.22; 2012-18, s. 2.1; 2013-381, s. 3.2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.2(a); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled `Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes conformed references in subsection (c).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (c).

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 1.1, provides: “Parts 1 through 6 of this act shall be known and cited as the Voter Information Verification Act.” Session Laws 2018-144, s. 2(a) repealed Session Laws 2013-381, s. 1.1, effective December 19, 2018.

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 6.2(6), provides: “At any primary and election between May 1, 2014, and January 1, 2016, any registered voter may present that voter’s photo identification to the elections officials at the voting place but may not be required
to do so. At each primary and election between May 1, 2014, and January 1, 2016, each voter presenting in person shall be notified that photo identification will be needed to vote beginning in 2016 and be asked if that voter has one
of the forms of photo identification appropriate for voting. If that voter indicates he or she does not have one or more of the types of photo identification appropriate for voting, that voter shall be asked to sign an acknowledgment
of the photo identification requirement and be given a list of types of photo identification appropriate for voting and information on how to obtain those types of photo identification. The list of names of those voters who signed
an acknowledgment is a public record.”

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 60.1, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2019-4 provides in its preamble: “Whereas, in November 2018, the voters of North Carolina approved a constitutional amendment requiring every voter offering to vote in person to present photographic identification before voting; and

“Whereas, the approved constitutional amendment became effective upon certification of the November 6, 2018, election results; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly of North Carolina enacted S.L. 2018-144 in December 2018, setting forth the general laws governing the requirements of photographic identification for voting in person and the exceptions thereto, and setting forth a time
line of implementation for the 2019 elections and thereafter; and

“Whereas, S.L. 2018-144 also contained reforms to the process of absentee voting by mail and those reforms require rule making and other implementation efforts from the State Board of Elections; and

“Whereas, in February 2019, the need for a special congressional election to fill a vacancy in the United States House of Representatives has arisen due to unforeseen circumstances, and the Governor has determined a schedule for such special election;
and

“Whereas, in March 2019, the State Board of Elections issued an order to conduct a new election in a separate United States House of Representatives district and has determined a schedule for such new election; and

“Whereas, the schedule of the two additional elections generates concerns about the ability of the county boards of election and the State Board of Elections to ensure uniformity in the requirement to present photographic identification before voting
in person; and

“Whereas, the absentee voting by mail reforms in S.L. 2018-144 require rule making and other administrative procedures on the part of the State Board of Elections which will not be completed prior to the two additional 2019 congressional elections; and

“Whereas, the State Board of Elections needs legislative clarity regarding absentee voting by mail in order to conduct the two additional 2019 congressional elections in an orderly fashion; Now, therefore,”

Session Laws 2019-4, s. 1(a), provides: “S.L. 2018-144 shall not apply to any election held in 2019 for which the filing period opens prior to the date set forth in Section 1.5(a)(8) of S.L. 2018-144.”

Session Laws 2019-4, s. 1(b), provides: “Notwithstanding Section 1(a) of this act, all implementation and educational efforts set forth in S.L. 2018-144 during 2019 by the State and counties shall continue.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 10.22, effective August 21, 2009, in subdivision (a)(1), in the first sentence, substituted “twenty-four dollars ($24.00)” for “fifteen dollars ($15.00)” and “a first copy” for “any copy”; added the second sentence; in the third
sentence, inserted “for statewide issuance” near the beginning, substituted “these fees and shall retain ten dollars ($10.00) of these fees to cover local administrative costs and forward the remaining fees” for “this fee and shall
forward five dollars ($5.00) of this fee” near the middle, and inserted “the” near the end; and in subdivision (a)(2), inserted “for in-State requests and not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for out-of-state requests” near the middle.

Session Laws 2012-18, s. 2.1, effective July 1, 2012, deleted “these fees and shall retain ten dollars ($10.00) of these fees to cover local administrative costs” and “the remaining fees” from the third sentence and substituted “section fourteen dollars
($14.00) and shall charge and retain ten dollars ($10.00) if a copy of the record is made. Provided, however, that a local agency may waive the ten dollar ($10.00) charge for its retention when the copy is issued to a person over the
age of 62 years” for “section” at the end of subdivision (a)(1).

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 3.2, effective January 1, 2014, added subsection (c).

Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.2(a), effective December 19, 2018, in subsection (c), substituted “G.S. 163A-1145.1” for “G.S. 163A-1145” following “acceptable under.”

§ 130A-94.
Local registrar.

The local health director shall serve, ex officio, as the local registrar of each county within the jurisdiction of the local health department.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-95.
Control of local registrar.

The State Registrar shall direct, control and supervise the activities of local registrars.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 4; 1915, c. 20; C.S., ss. 7089, 7090; 1955, c. 951, s. 6; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 462, s. 14.

§ 130A-96.
Appointment of deputy and sub-registrars.

Each local registrar shall immediately upon appointment, appoint a deputy whose duty shall be to assist the local registrar and to act as local registrar in case of absence, illness, disability or removal of the local registrar. The deputy shall be designated
in writing and be subject to all rules and statutes governing local registrars. The local registrar shall direct, control and supervise the activities of the deputy registrar and may remove a deputy registrar for cause.

The local registrar may, when necessary and with the approval of the State Registrar, appoint one or more persons to act as sub-registrars. Sub-registrars shall be authorized to receive certificates and issue burial-transit permits in and for designated
portions of the county. Each sub-registrar shall enter the date the certificate was received and shall forward all certificates to the local registrar within three days.

The State Registrar shall direct, control and supervise sub-registrars and may remove a sub-registrar for cause.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 4; C.S., s. 7091; 1955, c. 951, s. 8; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-97.
Duties of local registrars.

The local registrar shall:

Administer and enforce provisions of this Article and the rules, and immediately report any violation to the State Registrar;

Furnish certificate forms and instructions supplied by the State Registrar to persons who require them;

Examine each certificate when submitted to determine if it has been completed in accordance with the provisions of this Article and the rules. If a certificate is incomplete or unsatisfactory, the responsible person shall be notified and required to furnish
the necessary information. All birth and death certificates shall be typed or written legibly in permanent black, blue-black, or blue ink;

Enter the date on which a certificate is received and sign as local registrar;

Transmit to the register of deeds of the county a copy of each certificate registered within seven days of receipt of a birth or death certificate. The copy transmitted shall include the race of the father and mother if that information is contained on
the State copy of the certificate of live birth. Copies transmitted may be on blanks furnished by the State Registrar or may be photocopies made in a manner approved by the register of deeds. The local registrar may also keep a
copy of each certificate for no more than two years;

On the fifth day of each month or more often, if requested, send to the State Registrar all original certificates registered during the preceding month; and

Maintain records, make reports and perform other duties required by the State Registrar.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 18; 1915, c. 85, s. 2; c. 164, s. 2; C.S., s. 7109; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 58, s. 1; 1931, c. 79; 1933, c. 9, s. 1; 1943, c. 673; 1949, c. 133; 1955, c. 951, ss. 20, 21; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 492, ss.
4, 8; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1971, c. 444, s. 8; 1979, c. 95, s. 9; 1981, c. 554; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2003-60, s. 1.

§ 130A-98.
Pay of local registrars.

A local health department shall provide sufficient staff, funds and other resources necessary for the proper administration of the local vital records registration program.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 19; Ex. Sess. 1913, c. 15, s. 1; 1915, c. 85, s. 3; 1919, c. 210, s. 1; C.S., s 7110; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 58, s. 2; 1949, c. 306; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-65.

Moore: 1975, c. 422.

§ 130A-99.
Register of deeds to preserve copies of birth and death records.

The register of deeds of each county shall file and preserve the copies of birth and death certificates furnished by the local registrar under the provisions of

G.S. 130A-97

, and shall make and keep a proper index of the certificates. These certificates shall be open to inspection and examination. Copies or abstracts of these certificates shall be provided to any person upon request.
Certified copies of these certificates shall be provided only to those persons described in G.S. 130A-93(c).

The register of deeds may remove from the records and destroy copies of birth or death certificates for persons born or dying in counties other than the county in which the office of the register of deeds is located, only after confirming that copies
of the birth or death certificates removed and destroyed are maintained by the State Registrar or North Carolina State Archives.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 80, s. 3; c. 1031, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-309, s. 11.

§ 130A-100.
Register of deeds may perform notarial acts.

The register of deeds is authorized to take acknowledgments, administer oaths and affirmations and to perform all other notarial acts necessary for the registration or issuance of certificates relating to births, deaths or marriages. The register of deeds
shall be entitled to a fee as prescribed in

G.S. 161-10

.

All acknowledgments taken, affirmations or oaths administered or other notarial acts performed by the register of deeds relating to the registration of certificates of births, deaths or marriages prior to June 16, 1959, are validated.

History.
1945, c. 100; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 986; 1969, c. 80, s. 9; c. 1031, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-101.
Birth registration.

A certificate of birth for each live birth, regardless of the gestation period, which occurs in this State shall be filed with the local registrar of the county in which the birth occurs within 10 days after the birth and shall be registered by the registrar
if it has been completed and filed in accordance with this Article and the rules.

When a birth occurs in a hospital or other medical facility, the person in charge of the facility shall obtain the personal data, prepare the certificate, secure the signatures required by the certificate and file it with the local registrar within 10
days after the birth. The physician or other person in attendance shall provide the medical information required by the certificate.

When a birth occurs outside a hospital or other medical facility, the certificate shall be prepared and filed by one of the following in the indicated order of priority:

The physician in attendance at or immediately after the birth, or in the absence of such a person;

Any other person in attendance at or immediately after the birth, or in the absence of such a person;

The father, the mother or, in the absence or inability of the father and the mother, the person in charge of the premises where the birth occurred.

When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance and the child is first moved from the conveyance in this State, the birth shall be registered in the county where the child is first removed from the conveyance, and that place shall be considered the place of
birth.

If the mother was married at the time of either conception or birth, or between conception and birth, the name of the husband shall be entered on the certificate as the father of the child, except as provided in this subsection. The surname of the child
shall be the same as that of the husband, except that upon agreement of the husband and mother, or upon agreement of the mother and father if paternity has been otherwise determined, any surname may be chosen. The name of the putative
father shall be entered on the certificate as the father of the child if one of the following conditions exists:

Paternity has been otherwise determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in which case the name of the father as determined by the court shall be entered.

The child’s mother, mother’s husband, and putative father complete an affidavit acknowledging paternity that contains all of the following:

A sworn statement by the mother consenting to the assertion of paternity by the putative father and declaring that the putative father is the child’s natural father.

A sworn statement by the putative father declaring that he believes he is the natural father of the child.

A sworn statement by the mother’s husband consenting to the assertion of paternity by the putative father.

Information explaining in plain language the effect of signing the affidavit, including a statement of parental rights and responsibilities and an acknowledgment of the receipt of this information.

The social security numbers of the putative father, mother, and mother’s husband.

The results of a DNA test that has confirmed the paternity of the putative father.

If the mother was unmarried at all times from date of conception through date of birth, the name of the father shall not be entered on the certificate unless the child’s mother and father complete an affidavit acknowledging paternity which contains the
following:

A sworn statement by the mother consenting to the assertion of paternity by the father and declaring that the father is the child’s natural father and that the mother was unmarried at all times from the date of conception through the date of birth;

A sworn statement by the father declaring that he believes he is the natural father of the child;

Information explaining in plain language the effect of signing the affidavit, including a statement of parental rights and responsibilities and an acknowledgment of the receipt of this information; and

The social security numbers of both parents.The State Registrar, in consultation with the Child Support Enforcement Section of the Division of Social Services, shall develop and disseminate a form affidavit for use in compliance with this section, together
with an information sheet that contains all the information required to be disclosed by subdivision (3) of this subsection.Upon the execution of the affidavit, the declaring father shall be listed as the father on the birth
certificate, subject to the declaring father’s right to rescind under

G.S. 110-132

. The executed affidavit shall be filed with the registrar along with the birth certificate. In the event paternity is properly placed at issue, a certified copy of the affidavit shall be admissible in
any action to establish paternity. The surname of the child shall be determined by the mother, except if the father’s name is entered on the certificate, the mother and father shall agree upon the child’s surname. If there
is no agreement, the child’s surname shall be the same as that of the mother.The execution and filing of this affidavit with the registrar does not affect rights of inheritance unless the affidavit is also filed with the
clerk of court in accordance with G.S. 29-19(b)(2).

Each parent shall provide his or her social security number to the person responsible for preparing and filing the certificate of birth.

When a birth occurs, the person responsible for preparing the birth certificate under this section shall provide the mother, father, or legal guardian of the child with information about how to request a protected consumer security freeze for the child
under

G.S. 75-63.1

and the potential benefits of doing so.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 13; 1915, c. 85, s. 1; C.S., s. 7010; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1979, c. 95, s. 4; c. 417; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 199, ss. 1, 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 6; 1993, c. 333,
s. 1; 1995, c. 428, s. 1; 1997-433, s. 4.12; 1998-17, s. 1; 2005-389, s. 4; 2009-285, s. 1; 2013-378, s. 8; 2015-193, s. 4.

§ 130A-102.
Contents of birth certificate.

The certificate of birth shall contain those items recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics, except as amended or changed by the State Registrar. Medical information contained in a birth certificate shall not be public
records open to inspection.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 14; C.S., s. 7102; 1949, c. 161, s. 2; 1955, c. 951, s. 15; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1979, c. 95, s. 7; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-103.
Registration of birth certificates more than five days and less than one year after birth.

Any birth may be registered more than five days and less than one year after birth in the same manner as births are registered under this Article within five days of birth. The registration shall have the effect as if the registration had occurred within
five days of birth. The registration however, shall not relieve any person of criminal liability for the failure to register the birth within five days of birth as required by

G.S. 130A-101

.

History.
1941, c. 126; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1979, c. 95, s. 5; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-104.
Registration of birth one year or more after birth.

When the birth of a person born in this State has not been registered within one year after birth, a delayed certificate may be filed with the register of deeds in the county in which the birth occurred. An applicant for a delayed certificate must submit
the minimum documentation prescribed by the State Registrar.

A certificate of birth registered one year or more after the date of the birth shall be marked “delayed” and show the date of the delayed registration. A summary statement of evidence submitted in support of the delayed registration shall be endorsed
on the certificate. The register of deeds shall forward the original and a duplicate to the State Registrar for final approval. If the certificate complies with the rules and has not been previously registered, the State Registrar
shall file the original and return the duplicate to the register of deeds for recording.

When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation required or when the State Registrar finds reason to question the validity or adequacy of the certificate or documentary evidence, the State Registrar shall not register the delayed certificate
and shall advise the applicant of the reasons for this action. If the deficiencies are not corrected, the applicant shall be advised of the right to an administrative hearing and of the availability of a judicial determination
under

G.S. 130A-106

.

Delayed certificates shall have the same evidentiary value as those registered within five days.

History.
1941, c. 126; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 80, s. 8; c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1979, c. 95, s. 6; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-105.
Validation of irregular registration of birth certificates.

The registration and filing with the State Registrar prior to April 1, 1941, of the birth certificate of a person whose birth was not registered within five days of birth is validated. All copies of birth certificates filed prior to April 9, 1941, properly
certified by the State Registrar, shall have the same evidentiary value as those registered within five days.

History.
1941, c. 126; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-106.
Establishing fact of birth by persons without certificates.

A person born in this State not having a recorded certificate of birth, may file a verified petition with the clerk of the superior court in the county of the petitioner’s legal residence or place of birth, setting forth the date, place of birth and parentage,
and petitioning the clerk to hear evidence, and to find and adjudge the date, place and parentage of the birth of the petitioner. Upon the filing of a petition, the clerk shall set a hearing date, and shall conduct the proceeding
in the same manner as other special proceedings. At the time set for the hearing, the petitioner shall present evidence to establish the facts of birth. If the evidence offered satisfies the court, the court shall enter judgment
establishing the date, place of birth and parentage of the petitioner, and record it in the record of special proceedings. The clerk shall certify the judgment to the State Registrar who shall keep a record of the judgment. A copy
shall be certified to the register of deeds of the county in which the petitioner was born.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-323, s. 30.10(f), effective August 1, 2007, and applicable to all costs assessed or collected on or after that date.

The record of birth established under this section, when recorded, shall have the same evidentiary value as other records covered by this Article.

History.
1941, c. 122; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2007-323, s. 30.10(f).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 30.10(f), effective August 1, 2007, and applicable to all costs assessed or collected on or after that date, deleted subsection (b), which read: “The clerk may charge a fee not to exceed two dollars ($2.00) for services provided
under this section.”

§ 130A-107.
Establishing facts relating to a birth of unknown parentage; certificate of identification.

A person of unknown parentage whose place and date of birth are unknown may file a verified petition with the clerk of the superior court in the county where the petitioner was abandoned. The petition shall set forth the facts concerning abandonment,
the name, date and place of birth of petitioner and the names of any persons acting in loco parentis to the petitioner.

The clerk shall find facts and, if there is insufficient evidence to establish the place of birth, it shall be conclusively presumed that the person was born in the county of abandonment. The clerk shall enter and record judgment in the record of special
proceedings. The clerk shall certify the judgment to the State Registrar who shall keep a record of the judgment. A copy shall be certified to the register of deeds of the county of abandonment.

A certificate of identification for a person of unknown parentage shall be filed by the clerk with the local registrar of vital statistics of the district in which the person was found.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-323, s. 30.10(g), effective August 1, 2007, and applicable to all costs assessed or collected on or after that date.

History.
1959, c. 492; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2007-323, s. 30.10(g).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 30.10(g), effective August 1, 2007, and applicable to all costs assessed or collected on or after that date, deleted subsection (d), which read: “The clerk may charge a fee not to exceed two dollars ($2.00) for services provided
under this section.”

§ 130A-108.
Certificate of identification for individual of foreign birth.

In the case of an adopted individual born in a foreign country and residing in this State at the time of application, the State Registrar shall, upon the presentation of a certified copy of the original birth certificate from the country of birth and
a certified copy of the final order of adoption signed by the clerk of court or other appropriate official, prepare a certificate of identification for the individual. The certificate shall contain the same information required
by G.S. 48-9-107(a) for individuals adopted in this State, except that the country of birth shall be specified in lieu of the state of birth.

In the case of an adopted individual born in a foreign country and readopted in this State, the State Registrar shall, upon receipt of a report of that adoption from the Division of Social Services pursuant to G.S. 48-9-102(f), prepare a certificate of
identification for that individual. The certificate shall contain the same information required by G.S. 48-9-107(a) for individuals adopted in this State, except the country of birth shall be specified in lieu of the state of birth.

History.
1949, c. 160, s. 2; 1955, c. 951, s. 16; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1995, c. 457, s. 8; 1997-215, s. 13; 2001-208, s. 13; 2001-487, s. 101.

§ 130A-109.
Birth certificate as evidence.

Certified copies of birth certificates shall be accepted by public school authorities in this State as prima facie evidence of the age of children registering for school attendance, and no other proof shall be required. In addition, certified copies of
birth certificates shall be required by all factory inspectors and employers of youthful labor, as prima facie proof of age, and no other proof shall be required. However, when it is not possible to secure a certified copy of a birth
certificate, factory inspectors and employers may accept as secondary proof of age any competent evidence by which the age of persons is usually established. School authorities may accept only competent and verifiable evidence as secondary
proof of age, specifically including but not limited to: (i) a certified copy of any medical record of the child’s birth issued by the treating physician or the hospital in which the child was born, or (ii) a certified copy of a birth
certificate issued by a church, mosque, temple, or other religious institution that maintains birth records of its members.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 17; C.S., s. 7107; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2011-388, s. 3.